tables/hu-hu-g2.ctb
# liblouis: Hungarian Grade 2 table
#
# -----------
#-index-name: Hungarian, contracted
#-display-name: Hungarian contracted braille
#
#+locale:hu
#+type:literary
#+contraction:full
#+grade:2
# Marked as "direction:forward" by Bue Vester-Andersen
# as tests only run forward.
#+direction:both
#+hyphenation:yes
#
# TODO: Please correct the metadata above. It is not meant to be
# accurate nor complete. It hasn't been verified by the table
# author yet. It is merely an attempt by the liblouis maintainers
# to get some sensible initial values in place.
#
# TODO: Please add a reference to official documentation about
# the implemented braille code. Preferably submit the documents
# to https://github.com/liblouis/braille-specs.
# -----------
#
#  Copyright (C) 2017 Attila Hammer from IT Foundation for the Visually Impaired - Hungary. www.infoalap.hu
#
#  This file is part of liblouis.
#
#  liblouis is free software: you can redistribute it and/or modify it
#  under the terms of the GNU Lesser General Public License as
#  published by the Free Software Foundation, either version 2.1 of the
#  License, or (at your option) any later version.
#
#  liblouis is distributed in the hope that it will be useful, but
#  WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
#  MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE. See the GNU
#  Lesser General Public License for more details.
#
#  You should have received a copy of the GNU Lesser General Public
#  License along with liblouis. If not, see
#  <http://www.gnu.org/licenses/>.
#
#  Maintained by Attila Hammer  hammer.attila@infoalap.hu
#
# If you found bugs with hungarian grade1 table, report it with following address:
# Attila Hammer <hammer.attila@infoalap.hu
#If you have a Launchpad account, report table related requests with following bug tracker address: https://bugs.launchpad.net/belin

include hu-backtranslate-correction.dis
include hu-chardefs.cti
include hu-exceptionwords.cti
include hu-hu-g2_exceptions.cti
include hyph_hu_HU.dic
include braille-patterns.cti
#Braille indicators
numsign 3456
capsletter 46a
noback pass2 @46a ? # remove in a second pass because single capital letters are not indicated
begcapsword 46
emphclass italic
emphclass underline
emphclass bold
begemph italic 356
endemph italic  236
begemph bold 356
endemph bold 236
begemph underline 356
endemph underline 236
begcomp 456-346
endcomp 456-156
midnum : 3
midnum - 36-3456
hyphen - 36
decpoint , 2
midnum . 3-3456
endnum . 3
endnum – 36-36
#Following part implementing the new braille standard changes
#When some punctuation character have after end of numbers, need add a dot6 prefix before the punctuation character dots
endnum : 6-25
endnum ? 6-26
endnum ; 6-23
endnum ! 6-235
endnum " 6-236
endnum * 6-35
always . 3
always ' 6-3
postpunc . 256
postpunc ; 23
word ; 23
midnum : 25
postpunc : 25
always : 25
always ! 235
endnum . 3
always • 6-35
endnum % 3456-245-356
endnum / 5-2
endnum $ 5-145
prepunc $ 5-145
postpunc $ 5-145

# literary forms of the decimal digits
include litdigits6Dots.uti
midendnumericmodechars ,:.-
nocontractsign 6
numericnocontchars abcdefghij-
#Correcting forward translation when after a number following a hyphen
#character, and a literary digit letter (for example a, b, c, etc).
#This situation not need putting the dot 6 combination
attribute notaccentedletters abcdefghijABCDEFGHIJ-
attribute accentedletters áéíöőüűúóklmnopqrstuvwxyz
noback pass2 $D[@36-6]%notaccentedletters @36
noback pass2 $D[@36-36-6]%notaccentedletters @36-36
#Correct forward translation, when after a number not need putting the dot 6 prefix the v abbreviation (for example the 4-gyel string
noback pass2 $D[@6-1236] @1236
#Correcting backward translation too, because for example the „#bj-ai”,
#„#be-ei” eurobraille output since Liblouis 3.9.0 version producing numbers
#the back translation, not the „20-ai”, „25-ei” strings.
#wrong backtranslated output is „20-19”, „25-59”
nofor pass2 $D[@36-36]%notaccentedletters @36-36-6
nofor pass2 $D[@36]%notaccentedletters @36-6
nofor correct $D1-30["--annyi"] "--ai"
nofor correct $D1-30["--ennyi"] "--ei"
nofor correct $D1-30["-annyi"] "-ai"
nofor correct $D1-30["-ennyi"] "-ei"
#Special letter replacements
always cs 146	General need replacing cs letters with a combined dot combination
always ccs 146-146	General need replacing ccs letters with a combined dot combination
always csz 14-156
always cszs 146-345
always ccsz 14-14-156
always gy 1456	General need replacing gy letters with a combined dot combination
always ggy 1456-1456	General need replacing ggy letters with a combined dot combination
always ly 456
always lly 456-456	General need replacing ly letters with a combined dot combination
always ny 1246	General need replacing ny letters with a combined dot combination
always nny 1246-1246	General need replacing nny letters with a combined dot combination
always ty 1256	General need replacing ty letter pairs with a combined dot combination
always tty 1256-1256		General need replacing ty letter pairs with a combined dot combination combined dot combination
always sz 156	General need replacing sz letters with a combined dot combination
always ssz 156-156
always zsz 126-156
always zszs 345-345
always zs 345	General need replacing zs letters with a combined dot combination
always zzs 345-345	General need replacing zs letters with a combined dot combination

#Special punctuation simbols
prepunc " 236	Opening quotation simbol
postpunc " 356	Closing quotation simbol
prepunc « 236
postpunc » 356
prepunc » 236
postpunc « 356
always " 236	Need this rule to present one left quotation mark if the user firsttyping the " character
#some left and right parentheses related rules, with affecting only the back translation
nofor partword ( 2346	For example with csinál(hat) word correct backtranslation related
nofor partword ) 1356	Same the left parenthese related rule, this rule need only to Liblouis result correct back translation if inside a word have a right parenthese character
prepunc ( 2346	Opening left parenthese
postpunc ) 1356	Closing right parenthese
always ( 2346	Need this rule to the user always see 2346 dot combination if type first ( character a text
always ) 1356	Need this rule to the user always see 2346 dot combination if type first ) character a text
prepunc « 236
postpunc » 356
prepunc ‘ 236
postpunc ’ 356
prepunc ‚ 236
postpunc ‚ 356
prepunc “ 236
prepunc ” 236
postpunc ” 356
prepunc „ 236
postpunc „ 356
prepunc < 5-13
postpunc > 46-2

#Other exceptions With need marking different dot combination
always # 123456
#Hessmark backtranslation handling related special rule
nofor context @123456 "#"
always $ 5-145
always % 3456-245-356
always ~ 5-2345
always < 5-13
always > 46-2
always / 5-2
endnum | 5-1245
prepunc | 5-1245
postpunc | 5-1245
always | 5-1245
always { 5-2346
always } 5-1356
always [ 46-2346
always ] 46-1356
endnum \\ 5-16
prepunc \\ 5-16
postpunc \\ 5-16
always \\ 5-16
always \\ 5-16
endnum ^ 5-124
prepunc ^ 5-124
postpunc ^ 5-124
always ^ 5-124
endnum ` 5-14
prepunc ` 5-14
postpunc ` 5-14
punctuation ` 5-14
always ` 5-14
noback always Æ 1
always lyú 456-346
always lysz 456-156

#define context rules related need classes
attribute orszag O
attribute nevelo A
attribute oneromannumber I
attribute fiveromannumber V
attribute tenromannumber X
attribute fiftyromannumber L 
attribute hundredromannumber C
attribute nagysz S

#handle extra special abbreviation rules with context opcodes
#not always need abbreviate the ország word, for example person and continent names. The next rule handle this situation
noback context $U["rszág"]$s$U$a @1235-156-4-1245

#general, need abbreviate the "volt" word, but this word some time meaning hungarian language the electric measurement.
#following context rules handles this extra situation
noback context [%nevelo$s"Volt"]$s"egy"$s @2-1236-135-123-2345
noback context ["volt"]$s"körül" @1236-135-123-2345
noback context ["egyenlő\shány\svolt"] @15-1456-15-1345-123-12456-0-125-4-1246-0-1236-135-123-2345
noback context $l["ány\svolt\sáram"] @4-1246-0-1236-135-123-2345-0-4-1235-1-134

#some context rules with the "az" and "a" verbs related
noback context ["az\sokoz"] @1-126-0-135-13-135-126
noback context ["az\saz\s"] @1-126-0-3	General, if a text part have the "az" word, need joining the second word before a dot3 cell dot. But, if a text part have the az word two times, the first az word not need abbreviate with dot2 and joining the second az word, the first az word need presenting with following dots: 1-126-0. An example: az az igazság
noback context ["az\sa\s"] @1-126-0-2
noback context [%nevelo"z\sa\s"] @1-126-0-2
noback context ["az\s"]"is"$p @1-126-0
noback context ["az\s"]"is\s" @1-126-0
noback context [%nevelo"z\sis\s"] @1-126-0-24-0
noback context [%nevelo"z\s"]"is"$p @1-126-0
noback context ["a\s"]"és" @1-0
noback context ["az\segyelőre"] @1-126-0-15-1456-15-123-12456-1235-15
noback context ["az\sugyanis"] @1-126-0-136-1456-1-1345-24-234
noback context ["az\sadja"] @1-126-0-1-145-245-1
noback context ["az\sadta"] @1-126-0-1-145-2345-1
noback context ["az\ssem"]$s @1-126-0-234-15-134
noback context ["az\ssem"]$p @1-126-0-234-15-134
noback context ["az\saz\ssem"]$p @1-126-0-1-126-0-234-15-134
noback context ["az\slenne"] @1-126-0-123-15-1345-1345-15
noback context ["az\slesz"] @1-126-0-123
noback context ["az\sleszel"] @1-126-0-123-15-156-15-123
noback context ["az\sleszek"] @1-126-0-123-15-156-15-13
noback context ["az\s"]"volt" @1-126-0
noback context [%nevelo"z"]$s"az"$s @1-126
noback context [%nevelo"z"]$s"okoz" @1-126
noback context [%nevelo"z"]$s"egyelőre" @1-126
noback context [%nevelo"z"]$s"ugyanis" @1-126
noback context [%nevelo"z"]$s"adja" @1-126
noback context [%nevelo"z"]$s"adta" @1-126
noback context [%nevelo"z"]$s"lenne" @1-126
noback context [%nevelo"z"]$s"sem" @1-126
noback context [%nevelo"z"]$s"lesz"$s @1-126
noback context [%nevelo"z"]$s"lesz" @1-126
noback context [%nevelo"z"]$s"lesz"$p @1-126
noback context [%nevelo"z"]$s"volt" @1-126
noback context [%nevelo"z"]$s"volt"$p @1-126
noback context ["az\salábbi"] @1-126-0-1-123-4-12-12-24
noback context [%nevelo"z\salábbi"] @1-126-0-1-123-4-12-12-24
#general, after comma character need joining the next text part with after the comma character, but need some context rules to this braille standard works gracefully
noback context [",\saz\sa\s"] @2-1-126-0-2
noback context [",\saz\saz\s"] @2-1-126-0-3
noback context [",\s"] @2
noback context [",\n"] @2
noback context [",\n\r"] @2
noback context $a["\na\s"] @0-2
#handle roman numbers related special rules
noback context [%oneromannumber]"." @46-24
noback context $U[%oneromannumber]"." @24
noback context [%fiveromannumber]"." @46-1236
noback context $U[%fiveromannumber]"." @1236
noback context [%tenromannumber]"." @46-1346
noback context $U[%tenromannumber]"." @1346
noback context [%fiftyromannumber]"." @46-123
noback context $U[%fiftyromannumber]"." @123
noback context [%hundredromannumber]"." @46-14
noback context $U[%hundredromannumber]"." @14

#some country names related context rules
noback context $U"io"$s["de"]$s$U"anerio" @145-15 
noback context $U"io"$s["de"]$s$U"aneiro" @145-15 
